en: Fresh lentil pasta
fr: Pâtes de lentille fraîches

en: Split pea pasta
fr: Pâtes de pois cassés
hr: Tjestenina od graška
it: Pasta di piselli

fr: Pâtes de petit épeautre, pâtes à base de petit épeautre, Pâtes Petit épeautre
it: Pasta di piccolo farro

en: Buckwheat pasta
es: Pastas de trigo sarraceno
fr: Pâtes de sarrasin, Pâte de sarrasin, Pâtes de sarrazin, Pâte de sarrazin
hr: Tjestenina od heljde
it: Pasta di grano saraceno
nl: Boekweit pasta

en: Fresh pasta
de: Frische Nudeln
es: Pasta fresca
fi: tuorepasta
fr: Pâtes fraîches
hr: Svježa tjestenina
it: Pasta fresca
nl: Verse pastas

en: Frozen pasta
fr: Pâtes surgelées

fr: Pâtes d'Alsace
nl: Pastas uit de Alsace

en: Fresh egg pasta
es: Pasta fresca de huevo
fr: Pâtes fraîches aux œufs, pâtes fraîches aux œufs frais
hr: Tjestenina od svježih jaja
it: Pasta fresca all'uovo
nl: Verse eierpasta

en: Fresh cooked unsalted egg pasta
fr: Pâtes fraîches aux œufs cuites non salées

en: Dry pastas, Dried pastas, Dry pasta
bg: Суха паста
ca: Pasta seca
de: getrocknete Teigwaren
es: Pasta seca
fi: kuiva pasta
fr: Pâtes sèches, Pâtes alimentaires sèches
he: פסטה מיובשת
hr: Suhe tjestenine
hu: Száraztészták
it: Pasta secca, Pasta cruda essiccata
nl: Gedroogde pastas
pl: Makaron suchy
pt: Massas secas
ru: Макароны
sv: Torr pasta, Torrpasta
th: กลุ่ใผลิตภัณฑ์พาสต้าแห้ง
zh: 干意面

en: Dry durum wheat pasta
fr: Pâtes de blé dur sèches
sv: Torr durumvetepasta, Torr pasta av durumvete

en: Raviolis, Ravioli
xx: Ravioli
ar: رافيولي
bg: Равиоли
cs: ravioly
el: ραβιόλια
eo: Ravioloj
fa: راویولی
fi: Ravioli, Raviolit
fr: Raviolis, Ravioli
he: רביולי
hy: Ռավիոլի
ja: ラビオリ
kk: Равиоли
ko: 라비올리
lt: Ravioliai, virti įdaryti makaronai
ru: Равиоли
sk: Raviola
th: ราวีโอลี
uk: Равіолі
zh: 意大利餃

en: Pasta stuffed with fish
es: Pasta rellena de pescado
fr: Pâtes farcies au poisson
hr: Tjestenina punjena ribom
it: Pasta ripiena di pesce
nl: Gevulde pasta met vis

fr: Ravioli au saumon fumé
en: Smoked salmon ravioli
es: Ravioli de salmón ahumado
hr: Ravioli od dimljenog lososa
it: Ravioli al salmone affumicato

en: Pasta stuffed with cheese
de: Käse gefüllte Pasta
es: Pasta rellena de queso
fr: Pâtes farcies au fromage
hr: Tjestenina punjena sirom
it: Pasta ripiena di formaggio
nl: Pasta gevuld met kaas
pt: Massa recheada com queijo

en: Ravioli with ricotta and spinach
fr: Ravioli ricotta & épinards, Ravioli ricotta épinards
hr: Ravioli s ricottom i špinatom
it: Ravioli ricotta e spinaci

en: pierogi
cs: pirohy
hr: Pirogi
pl: pierogi
ru: пероги
sk: pirohy
ua: пироги, вареники

en: Frozen pierogi
fr: Pierogi surgelés

en: Ravioles du Dauphiné
fr: Ravioles du Dauphiné, Raviolis du Dauphiné

en: Cooked Ravioles du Dauphiné
fr: Raviolis du Dauphiné cuits, Ravioles du Dauphiné cuites